Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Subarticle B. Issuance of Shares.

§79-4-6.20.
Subscription for shares before incorporation.

A subscription for shares entered into before incorporation is irrevocable for six (6) months unless the subscription agreement provides a longer or shorter period or all the subscribers agree to revocation.

The board of directors may determine the payment terms of subscriptions for shares that were entered into before incorporation, unless the subscription agreement specifies them. A call for payment by the board of directors must be uniform so far as practicable as to all shares of the same class or series, unless the subscription agreement specifies otherwise.

Shares issued pursuant to subscriptions entered into before incorporation are fully paid and nonassessable when the corporation receives the consideration specified in the subscription agreement.

If a subscriber defaults in payment of money or property under a subscription agreement entered into before incorporation, the corporation may collect the amount owed as any other debt. Alternatively, unless the subscription agreement provides otherwise, the corporation may rescind the agreement and may sell the shares if the debt remains unpaid more than twenty (20) days after the corporation sends a written demand for payment to the subscriber.

A subscription agreement entered into after incorporation is a contract between the subscriber and the corporation subject to Section 79-4-6.21.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.20; Laws, 2012, ch. 481, § 8, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, inserted “a” preceding “written demand for payment to the subscriber” at the end of (d).

Liability of purchaser from corporation of its own shares, see § 79-4-6.22.

Complainant induced by fraud to purchase stock did not ratify such purchase so as to preclude him setting it aside by transferring it before discovering the fraud. Jones v. Barnes, 107 Miss. 800, 66 So. 212, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 146 (Miss. 1914).

Complainant induced by fraud to purchase stock which he transferred to another held not required to return anything as condition precedent to his right to rescind upon both the assignee and the corporation becoming insolvent. Jones v. Barnes, 107 Miss. 800, 66 So. 212, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 146 (Miss. 1914).

Where maker of note for purchase-price of stock set up plea that payee bank had breached its agreement to furnish the corporation with sufficient capital to carry on business, thereby rendering the stock worthless, it was unnecessary to deny reception of the money by the maker. Merchants' & Farmers' Bank v. Smith, 107 Miss. 105, 64 So. 970, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 57 (Miss. 1914).

Subscription to capital stock of corporation to be organized may be withdrawn at any time before organization thereof. Wright Bros. v. Merchants' & Planters' Packet Co., 104 Miss. 507, 61 So. 550, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 57 (Miss. 1913).

Instruction authorizing recovery on written contract to subscribe for stock because of defendant’s attendance at meeting of prospective stockholders and participation therein, held erroneous. Wright Bros. v. Merchants' & Planters' Packet Co., 104 Miss. 507, 61 So. 550, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 57 (Miss. 1913).

Subscriber who has signed a promissory note to secure payment of his subscription for stock in corporation who afterwards acted as director therein and received a dividend, held estopped, when sued by receiver of the corporation on a separate cause of action, from demanding credit for the sum collected by the corporation on the note although the corporation held it only for collection and such collection was not made until the corporation had become insolvent and was disabled from issuing such subscriber a certificate for his stock. Allen v. Edwards, 93 Miss. 719, 47 So. 382, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 128 (Miss. 1908).

Enforcement of stock subscription after suit on note of subscriber is barred by statute of limitations.
11 A.L.R.2d 1380.

Conversion by promoter of money paid for preincorporation subscription for stock shares as embezzlement.
84 A.L.R.2d 1100.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 480 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:85 et seq.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1776 et seq.

7 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 81 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 345 et seq.

§79-4-6.21.
Issuance of shares.

The powers granted in this section to the board of directors may be reserved to the shareholders by the articles of incorporation.

The board of directors may authorize shares to be issued for consideration consisting of any tangible or intangible property or benefit to the corporation, including cash, promissory notes, services performed, contracts for services to be performed, or other securities of the corporation.

Before the corporation issues shares, the board of directors must determine that the consideration received or to be received for shares to be issued is adequate. That determination by the board of directors is conclusive insofar as the adequacy of consideration for the issuance of shares relates to whether the shares are validly issued, fully paid and nonassessable.

When the corporation receives the consideration for which the board of directors authorized the issuance of shares, the shares issued therefor are fully paid and nonassessable.

The corporation may place in escrow shares issued for a contract for future services or benefits or a promissory note, or make other arrangements to restrict the transfer of the shares, and may credit distributions in respect of the shares against their purchase price, until the services are performed, the note is paid or the benefits received. If the services are not performed, the note is not paid or the benefits are not received, the shares escrowed or restricted and the distributions credited may be cancelled in whole or part.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.21; Laws, 1988, ch. 368, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 18, 1988).

Applicability of this section to subscription agreement entered into after incorporation, see § 79-4-6.20.

Liability of purchaser from corporation of its own shares, see § 79-4-6.22.

Restriction on transfer or registration of transfer of shares, see § 79-4-6.27.

Shareholders’ preemptive rights, see § 79-4-6.30.

Purchaser of shares who, at the time of purchase, did not have knowledge of certain agreements authorized by § 79-4-7.32 entitled to rescission of the purchase, see § 79-4-7.32.

Procedure for adopting amendments to articles of incorporation once shares have been issued, see § 79-4-10.03.

Stock may be paid for by an assignment, in good faith, of contract rights. Sterling Varnish Co. v. Sonom Co., 241 Miss. 810, 133 So. 2d 624, 1961 Miss. LEXIS 403 (Miss. 1961).

This section [Code 1942, § 5327] applies to additional stock, authorized and issued after the corporation has become a going concern, and regardless of whether note given for corporate stock is secured by collateral other than the stock itself. Graves, Inc. v. Commissioner, 202 F.2d 286, 1953 U.S. App. LEXIS 4209 (5th Cir. Miss.), cert. denied, 346 U.S. 812, 74 S. Ct. 21, 98 L. Ed. 340, 1953 U.S. LEXIS 1733 (U.S. 1953).

Intent of this section [Code 1942, § 5327] is that all stock must be fully and actually paid for, and that payee of a note given in purported payment of stock cannot recover thereon, nor can a purchaser with notice. Graves, Inc. v. Commissioner, 202 F.2d 286, 1953 U.S. App. LEXIS 4209 (5th Cir. Miss.), cert. denied, 346 U.S. 812, 74 S. Ct. 21, 98 L. Ed. 340, 1953 U.S. LEXIS 1733 (U.S. 1953).

This section [Code 1942, § 5327] does not indicate any legislative intention to restrict its application to stock issued by a corporation before it became a going concern, or that it should not apply to additional stock authorized and issued after it became a going concern, or that it does not apply where a note given for corporate stock is secured by collateral other than the stock itself. Merchants Bank & Trust Co. v. Walker, 192 Miss. 737, 6 So. 2d 107, 1942 Miss. LEXIS 15 (Miss. 1942).

This section [Code 1942, § 5327] is applicable to banking corporations. Merchants Bank & Trust Co. v. Walker, 192 Miss. 737, 6 So. 2d 107, 1942 Miss. LEXIS 15 (Miss. 1942).

Under statute providing that stockholder should be individually liable for debts of corporation contracted during ownership of stock for amount remaining unpaid on stock subscription Code 1942, § 5332, trustee in bankruptcy of corporation held entitled to maintain suit on notes executed by stockholders for balance due on subscriptions for additional stock. Frazier v. Zachariah, 174 Miss. 378, 164 So. 893, 1936 Miss. LEXIS 188 (Miss. 1936).

Cancellation and surrender of notes, given by stockholders for purchase of additional stock by president of corporation without authorization of board of directors while corporation was hopelessly insolvent and less than one month before filing of petition in bankruptcy, held ineffectual to discharge liability of stockholder for balance due on stock as against trustee in bankruptcy of corporation. Frazier v. Zachariah, 174 Miss. 378, 164 So. 893, 1936 Miss. LEXIS 188 (Miss. 1936).

Note given to corporation for stock subscription held enforceable by innocent holder for value paid before maturity, notwithstanding statute providing that note given by subscriber for stock shall not be considered payment therefor. Gordin v. Bank of Forest, 170 Miss. 56, 153 So. 375, 1934 Miss. LEXIS 90 (Miss. 1934).

Purchaser knowing notes were given for corporate stock in violation of statute could not recover thereon. Aldridge v. Rice, 161 Miss. 879, 138 So. 570, 1932 Miss. LEXIS 185 (Miss. 1932).

That maker, after plaintiff purchased notes given for stock, received dividend and attended stockholders’ meeting did not estop maker to set up defense that notes violated statute. Aldridge v. Rice, 161 Miss. 879, 138 So. 570, 1932 Miss. LEXIS 185 (Miss. 1932).

Payee of note given in payment of stock in a corporation cannot recover thereon, nor can a purchaser with notice. Ellis Jones Drug Co. v. Williams, 139 Miss. 170, 103 So. 810, 1925 Miss. LEXIS 126 (Miss. 1925).

Stock may be paid for in property if done in good faith and on a fair valuation unless the charter or a statutory provision forbids it. Lea v. Cutrer, 96 Miss. 355, 51 So. 808, 1909 Miss. LEXIS 64 (Miss. 1909).

Defaulting subscriber cannot set up this section [Code 1942, § 5327] as a bar to liability as a stockholder in an action on behalf of creditors of the corporation. Allen v. Edwards, 93 Miss. 719, 47 So. 382, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 128 (Miss. 1908).

All stock must be fully and actually paid for. Alford v. Laurel Imp. Co., 86 Miss. 375, 38 So. 548, 1905 Miss. LEXIS 62 (Miss. 1905); Graves, Inc. v. Commissioner, 202 F.2d 286, 1953 U.S. App. LEXIS 4209 (5th Cir. Miss.), cert. denied, 346 U.S. 812, 74 S. Ct. 21, 98 L. Ed. 340, 1953 U.S. LEXIS 1733 (U.S. 1953).

Subscriber who has not fully paid for his stock cannot maintain replevin to recover the certificate therefor although he has given a note to the corporation for the full amount. Alford v. Laurel Imp. Co., 86 Miss. 375, 38 So. 548, 1905 Miss. LEXIS 62 (Miss. 1905).

Where subscriber gave note for stock and the corporation retained the certificate as security, the fact that the capital was then doubled and another certificate written in name of the subscriber did not entitle him to possession of it. Alford v. Laurel Imp. Co., 86 Miss. 375, 38 So. 548, 1905 Miss. LEXIS 62 (Miss. 1905).

Presumption as to value of corporate stock or bonds.
6 A.L.R.2d 189.

Meaning of “book value” of corporate stock.
51 A.L.R.2d 606.

Retroactive effect of statute fixing minimum value of corporate stock shares or otherwise affecting power of corporation to change par value of existing shares.
54 A.L.R.2d 1289.

What amounts to participation by corporate officer or agent in illegal issuance of security, in order to impose liability upon him under state securities regulations.
44 A.L.R.3d 588.

Valuation of corporate stock under “buy-out” or “first option” agreement giving option to or requiring corporation or other stockholders to purchase stock of deceased or withdrawing stockholders.
54 A.L.R.3d 790.

What constitutes waiver of stockholder’s or corporation’s right to enforce first-option stock purchase agreement.
55 A.L.R.3d 723.

Valuation of corporate stock for purposes of state gift, inheritance or estate tax, as affected by predetermined price in buy-out or first option agreement among stockholders or with corporation.
58 A.L.R.3d 1104.

Financial inability of corporation to take advantage of business opportunity as affecting determination whether “corporate opportunity” was presented.
16 A.L.R.4th 185.

Purchase of shares of corporation by director or officer as usurpation of “corporate opportunity”.
16 A.L.R.4th 784.

Valuation of closely held stock for federal estate tax purposes under
§ 2031(b) of Internal Revenue Code of 1954 ( 26 USCS § 2031(b)) and implementing regulations.
22 A.L.R. Fed. 31.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 368- 371 et seq. Graves, Inc. v. Commissioner, 202 F.2d 286 (5th Cir. Miss. 1953), cert. denied,
346 U.S. 812, 74 S. Ct. 21, 98 L. Ed. 340 (1953).

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:689.

2 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 625, Book Value.

2 Am. Jur. Proof of Facts 2d 1, Valuation of Stock of Closely Held Corporations.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 304 et seq.

§79-4-6.22.
Liability of shareholders.

A purchaser from a corporation of its own shares is not liable to the corporation or its creditors with respect to the shares except to pay the consideration for which the shares were authorized to be issued (Section 79-4-6.21) or specified in the subscription agreement (Section 79-4-6.20).

A shareholder of a corporation is not personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation except that he may become personally liable by reason of his own acts or conduct.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.22, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

A holder of or subscriber to shares of a corporation shall be under no obligation to the corporation or its creditors with respect to such shares, other than the obligation to pay the corporation the full consideration for which its shares were issued or to be issued. Wood v. Gulf States Capital Corp., 217 So. 2d 257, 1968 Miss. LEXIS 1259 (Miss. 1968).

Stock may be paid for by an assignment, in good faith, of contract rights. Sterling Varnish Co. v. Sonom Co., 241 Miss. 810, 133 So. 2d 624, 1961 Miss. LEXIS 403 (Miss. 1961).

Under statute providing that stockholder should be individually liable for debts of corporation contracted during ownership of stock for amount remaining unpaid on stock subscription, trustee in bankruptcy of corporation held entitled to maintain suit on notes executed by stockholders for balance due on subscriptions for additional stock. Frazier v. Zachariah, 174 Miss. 378, 164 So. 893, 1936 Miss. LEXIS 188 (Miss. 1936).

Cancellation and surrender of notes, given by stockholders for purchase of additional stock by president of corporation without authorization of board of directors while corporation was hopelessly insolvent and less than one month before filing of petition in bankruptcy, held ineffectual to discharge liability of stockholder for balance due on stock as against trustee in bankruptcy of corporation. Frazier v. Zachariah, 174 Miss. 378, 164 So. 893, 1936 Miss. LEXIS 188 (Miss. 1936).

Stockholder held not liable for debts and liabilities of corporation; stockholder of bottling corporation held not liable for damages to buyers where he did not participate in actual bottling of drinks. Grapico Bottling Co. v. Ennis, 140 Miss. 502, 106 So. 97, 1925 Miss. LEXIS 285 (Miss. 1925).

President held entitled to recover against stockholders where corporation had repurchased its own stock rendering it insolvent. First Nat'l Bank v. Pearson, 109 Miss. 638, 68 So. 921, 1915 Miss. LEXIS 206 (Miss. 1915).

Such stockholders were liable to creditor after the corporation’s bankruptcy and trustee’s refusal to sue for him. First Nat'l Bank v. Pearson, 109 Miss. 638, 68 So. 921, 1915 Miss. LEXIS 206 (Miss. 1915).

Knowledge of bank that money loaned to corporation was to be used for an unauthorized purpose does not render it liable to stockholders for loss arising from misuse of such funds in the absence of fraud on its part. Beckett v. Planters' Compress & Bonded Warehouse Co., 107 Miss. 305, 65 So. 275, 1914 Miss. LEXIS 84 (Miss. 1914).

Stockholder’s liability for withdrawn capital necessary to pay debts is several. Kimbrough v. Davies, 104 Miss. 722, 61 So. 697, 1913 Miss. LEXIS 78 (Miss. 1913).

Bank permitting executrix to fraudulently appropriate and sell stock therein to the prejudice of creditors held not liable to creditors. Myers v. Martinez, 95 Miss. 104, 48 So. 291, 1909 Miss. LEXIS 206 (Miss. 1909).

Stockholder held not liable for payment of judgment for damages for infringement of a patent. B. F. Avery & Sons v. McClure, 94 Miss. 172, 47 So. 901, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 33 (Miss. 1908).

Every subscriber is liable for debts contracted during his ownership of stock and for one year after he transfers it, to the amount of his unpaid subscription. Allen v. Edwards, 93 Miss. 719, 47 So. 382, 1908 Miss. LEXIS 128 (Miss. 1908).

A creditor of a corporation may recover the amount of unpaid subscription of a stockholder to its capital stock, although he has given a note to the corporation for the same, payable on calls, and having died before payment, the note has not been probated against his estate within the time prescribed by law. Robinette v. Starling, 72 Miss. 652, 18 So. 421, 1895 Miss. LEXIS 50 (Miss. 1895).

In such case the right to sue does not rest upon the relation of debtor and creditor between the plaintiff and stockholder, but upon the statute giving creditors of the corporation a right of action against its delinquent stockholders. Robinette v. Starling, 72 Miss. 652, 18 So. 421, 1895 Miss. LEXIS 50 (Miss. 1895).

Under this section [Code 1942, § 5332], making a stockholder liable, to the amount of his unpaid stock, for corporate debts created during his ownership thereof, the liability to continue for one year after a transfer thereof, the year does not begin until a transfer in the manner provided by the said statute, namely, by indorsement and delivery of the stock certificate and registry of the transfer on the books of the corporation. Kriger v. Hanover Nat'l Bank, 72 Miss. 462, 16 So. 351, 1894 Miss. LEXIS 81 (Miss. 1894).

A stockholder in an insolvent corporation who has not paid the stock subscription is liable to the creditors of the corporation and may be sued therefor, and the debt so due by him may be subjected by garnishment as well as in a direct prosecution, and although the subscription is, by its terms, payable on the call of the directors, and no such call has been in fact made. Scott v. Windham, 73 Miss. 76, 16 So. 206, 1895 Miss. LEXIS 75 (Miss. 1895).

A subsequent judgment against the stockholders in favor of one creditor of the corporation is erroneous if it fails to provide that no execution shall issue against him until satisfaction of an earlier judgment against him in favor of another creditor of the corporation, and then only for so much, if anything, as may remain due on the subscription. Scott v. Windham, 73 Miss. 76, 16 So. 206, 1895 Miss. LEXIS 75 (Miss. 1895).

The liability of a stockholder to a creditor whose debt was contracted during the debtor’s ownership of the stock is not discharged by a release executed by the corporation when solvent. Vick v. Larochelle, 57 Miss. 602, 1880 Miss. LEXIS 12 (Miss. 1880).

In a suit by judgment creditors of an insolvent corporation to compel stockholders to pay up on subscriptions, all of the solvent stockholders within the jurisdiction of the court must be joined as defendants, except where there are so many as to justify the charge that they are too numerous to be all made parties. Vick v. Lane, Hazelhurst & Co., 56 Miss. 681, 1879 Miss. LEXIS 192 (Miss. 1879).

Statute of frauds: promise by stockholder, officer, or director to pay debt of corporation. 35 A.L.R.2d 906.

Enforceability in another jurisdiction of personal liability of stockholders for debts of corporation whose organization is incomplete or defective. 42 A.L.R.2d 659.

Right or duty of corporation to refuse to transfer stock on presentation of properly indorsed certificate, because of conflicting rights or claims of one other than transferee.
75 A.L.R.2d 746.

Liability of corporate directors or officers for negligence in permitting conversion of property of third persons by corporation.
29 A.L.R.3d 660.

Liability of director or dominant shareholder for enforcing debt legally owed him by corporation.
56 A.L.R.3d 212.

Controlling stockholder’s duty to investigate intent and motive of purchaser before selling stock. 77 A.L.R.3d 1005.

Availability of and time for bringing action against former director, officer, or stockholder in dissolved corporation for personal injuries incurred after final dissolution.
20 A.L.R.4th 414.

Personal liability of stockholder, officer, or agent for debt of foreign corporation doing business in the state.
27 A.L.R.4th 387.

Professional corporation stockholder’s nonmalpractice liability. 50 A.L.R.4th 1276.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 724, 732 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 261 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 679 et seq.

§79-4-6.23.
Share dividends.

Unless the articles of incorporation provide otherwise, shares may be issued pro rata and without consideration to the corporation’s shareholders or to the shareholders of one or more classes or series. An issuance of shares under this subsection is a share dividend.

Shares of one class or series may not be issued as a share dividend in respect of shares of another class or series unless (1) the articles of incorporation so authorize, (2) a majority of the votes entitled to be cast by the class or series to be issued approve the issue, or (3) there are no outstanding shares of the class or series to be issued.

If the board of directors does not fix the record date for determining shareholders entitled to a share dividend, it is the date the board of directors authorizes the share dividend.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.23, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Corporation’s acquisition of its own shares, see § 79-4-6.31.

Record date for distribution to shareholders, see § 79-4-6.40.

Record date for determining shareholders entitled to notice of meeting, to demand special meeting, to vote, or to take other action, see § 79-4-7.07.

The receiver may bring such suit as representative of all the creditors. Metzger v. Joseph, 111 Miss. 385, 71 So. 645, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 309 (Miss. 1916).

Court of equity has jurisdiction of an action of a receiver of an insolvent bank to recover from directors a dividend disbursed in violation of this section [Code 1942, § 5328]. Metzger v. Joseph, 111 Miss. 385, 71 So. 645, 1916 Miss. LEXIS 309 (Miss. 1916).

Receiver, with court authority, may recover from stockholder dividends paid while bank was insolvent. Kretschmar v. Stone, 90 Miss. 375, 43 So. 177, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 45 (Miss. 1907).

Where declaration of receiver in such suit alleges authorization by chancery court to bring it, it is not demurrable on ground of want of jurisdiction. Kretschmar v. Stone, 90 Miss. 375, 43 So. 177, 1907 Miss. LEXIS 45 (Miss. 1907).

Validity of cancelation of accrued dividends on preferred corporate stock. 8 A.L.R.2d 893.

Over-payments of dividends on preferred stock as deductible in payment of dividends for later years. 10 A.L.R.2d 241.

Rights of preferred stockholders as to passed or accumulated dividends in going concern. 27 A.L.R.2d 1073.

Dividend rights in surplus of new consolidated corporation resulting from reduction of capital stock of former constituent corporations. 28 A.L.R.2d 1177.

Jurisdiction of action involving dividends of foreign corporation. 72 A.L.R.2d 1211.

18B Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 998 et seq.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:750 et seq.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Corporations, Forms 393 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 559 et seq.

§79-4-6.24.
Corporate issuance of rights, options and warrants; board may authorize officer or officers to designate recipients of rights, options and warrants.

A corporation may issue rights, options or warrants for the purchase of shares or other securities of the corporation. The board of directors shall determine (i) the terms upon which the rights, options or warrants are issued, and (ii) the terms, including the consideration for which the shares or other securities are to be issued. The authorization by the board of directors to issue such rights, options, or warrants constitutes authorization of the issuance of the shares or other securities for which the rights, options or warrants are exercisable.

The terms and conditions of such rights, options or warrants, including those outstanding on April 20, 2005, may include, without limitation, restrictions or conditions that preclude or limit the exercise, transfer or receipt of such rights, options or warrants by any person or persons owning or offering to acquire a specified number or percentage of the outstanding shares or other securities of the corporation, or by any transferee or transferees of any such person or persons, or that invalidate or void such rights, options or warrants held by any such person or persons or any such transferee or transferees.

The board of directors may authorize one or more officers to (1) designate the recipients of rights, options, warrants or other equity compensation awards that involve the issuance of shares, and (2) determine, within an amount and subject to any other limitations established by the board and, if applicable, the stockholders, the number of such rights, options, warrants or other equity compensation awards and the terms thereof to be received by the recipients, provided that an officer may not use such authority to designate either himself or herself or any other persons as the board of directors may specify as a recipient of such rights, options, warrants or other equity compensation awards.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2005, ch; Laws, 2009, ch. 530, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

A former § 79-4-6.24 [Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.24; Laws, 2001, ch. 435, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2001; Repealed by Laws, 2004, ch. 495, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 2004] also contained provisions for the issuance of rights, options, and warrants.

The 2009 amendment added (c).

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 358, 494.

§79-4-6.25.
Form and content of certificate.

Shares may but need not be represented by certificates. Unless this act or another statute expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are identical whether or not their shares are represented by certificates.

At a minimum each share certificate must state on its face:

The name of the issuing corporation and that it is organized under the law of this state;

The name of the person to whom issued; and

The number and class of shares and the designation of the series, if any, the certificate represents.

If the issuing corporation is authorized to issue different classes of shares or different series within a class, the designations, relative rights, preferences and limitations applicable to each class and the variations in rights, preferences and limitations determined for each series (and the authority of the board of directors to determine variations for future series) must be summarized on the front or back of each certificate or the corporation must furnish the shareholder this information on request in writing and without charge.

Each share certificate (1) must be signed (either manually or in facsimile) by two (2) officers designated in the bylaws or by the board of directors, and (2) may bear the corporate seal or its facsimile.

If the person who signed (either manually or in facsimile) a share certificate no longer holds office when the certificate is issued, the certificate is nevertheless valid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.25; Laws, 1990, ch. 384, § 55, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

Applicability of this section to certificates representing “scrip,” see § 79-4-6.04.

Application of this section to requirements for issuing shares without certificates, see § 79-4-6.26.

Necessity of delivery of stock certificates to complete valid gift of stock. 23 A.L.R.2d 1171.

Validity, construction, and effect of articles of incorporation or stock certificates relating to call, redemption, or retirement of common stock. 48 A.L.R.2d 392.

Right or duty of corporation to refuse to transfer stock on presentation of properly indorsed certificate, because of conflicting rights or claims of one other than transferee.
75 A.L.R.2d 746.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 405, 406.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:1155 et seq.

18 C.J.S., Corporations §§ 325 et seq.

§79-4-6.26.
Authorization to issue shares without certificates.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors of a corporation may authorize the issue of some or all of the shares of any or all of its classes or series without certificates. The authorization does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are surrendered to the corporation.

Within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of shares without certificates, the corporation shall send the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates by Section 79-4-6.25(b) and (c), and if applicable, Section 79-4-6.27.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 47, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

Existence of certain shareholder agreements, specifically permitted although otherwise inconsistent with this chapter, to be noted on share certificate or on information statement required by this section, see § 79-4-7.32.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations § 405.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 235.

§79-4-6.27.
Restriction on transfer of shares and other securities.

The articles of incorporation, bylaws, an agreement among shareholders or an agreement between shareholders and the corporation may impose restrictions on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares of the corporation. A restriction does not affect shares issued before the restriction was adopted unless the holders of the shares are parties to the restriction agreement or voted in favor of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is valid and enforceable against the holder or a transferee of the holder if the restriction is authorized by this section and its existence is noted conspicuously on the front or back of the certificate or is contained in the information statement required by Section 79-4-6.26(b). Unless so noted, a restriction is not enforceable against a person without knowledge of the restriction.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares is authorized:

To maintain the corporation’s status when it is dependent on the number or identity of its shareholders;

To preserve exemptions under federal or state securities law;

For any other reasonable purpose.

Prohibit the transfer of the restricted shares to designated persons or classes of persons, if the prohibition is not manifestly unreasonable.

A restriction on the transfer or registration of transfer of shares may:

Obligate the shareholder first to offer the corporation or other persons (separately, consecutively or simultaneously) an opportunity to acquire the restricted shares;

Obligate the corporation or other persons (separately, consecutively or simultaneously) to acquire the restricted shares;

Require the corporation, the holders of any class of its shares or another person to approve the transfer of the restricted shares, if the requirement is not manifestly unreasonable;

For purposes of this section, “shares” includes a security convertible into or carrying a right to subscribe for or acquire shares.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.27; Laws, 1990, ch. 384, § 56, eff from and after July 1, 1990.

Application of this section to requirements for issuing shares without certificates, see § 79-4-6.26.

Validity and construction of provision restricting transfer of corporate stock, which conditions transfer upon consent of one other than shareholder, officer, or director of corporation.
53 A.L.R.3d 1272.

What constitutes waiver of stockholder’s or corporation’s right to enforce first-option stock purchase agreement.
55 A.L.R.3d 723.

Valuation of corporate stock for purposes of state gift, inheritance or estate tax, as affected by predetermined price in buy-out or first option agreement among stockholders or with corporation.
58 A.L.R.3d 1104.

18A Am. Jur. 2d, Corporations §§ 172, 570-591.

6 Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations §§ 74:731-74:738, 74:1160, 74:1173.

7A Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms, Corporations, Form 101.

18 C.J.S., Corporations § 478.

§79-4-6.28.
Expenses of issue.

A corporation may pay the expenses of selling or underwriting its shares, and of organizing or reorganizing the corporation, from the consideration received for shares.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 486, § 6.28 eff from and after January 1, 1988.

6B Am. Jur. Legal Forms 2d, Corporations § 74:1787.